Mississippi, session 2026, HB578.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  For the purposes of this section, the term "state agency" means any agency, department or institution of the State of Mississippi.  In the negotiation and execution of any contract by or on behalf of a state agency, the executive director or the head of the state agency, the governing body of the state agency, the purchasing agent, or any other person designated by the state agency to negotiate the contract, may negotiate a limitation on the liability to the state of prospective contractors, provided that such limitation affords the state reasonable protection.  This negotiating power shall be in addition to any other authority that the executive director or head of the state agency, the governing body of the state agency, the purchasing agent, or any other person designated by the state agency has to negotiate and enter into contracts. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.